Massachusetts, session 194th, H2804.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law, rule or regulation to the
contrary, the Plymouth county retirement system shall credit Judy Hartigan, the Rockland Town
Collector, with creditable service for the service she rendered for the Town of Rockland for the
period of April 11, 2009 to the present, inclusive, for the purpose of determining her
superannuation retirement allowance pursuant to paragraph (a) of subdivision (2) of section 5 of
chapter 32 of the General Laws. Before the date that any retirement allowance becomes effective
in the case of Judy Hartigan, she shall pay into the annuity savings fund of the retirement system
in one sum or installments, upon such terms and conditions as the retirement system may
prescribe, an amount equal to that which would have been withheld as regular deductions from
of 2

her regular compensation for such previous service, or most recent portion thereof, as she may
elect, had she been a member of the Plymouth county retirement system during the period the
service was rendered, plus regular interest thereon.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2